California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The commissioner shall be paid his or her compensation and traveling and incidental expenses while he or she is attending the annual meeting of the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association or its successor and any other meetings he or she is required by the secretary to attend, or while he or she is on any service that requires him or her to go outside the county if the performance of that service has been authorized by the board of supervisors, the secretary or director, or this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2204.

The compensation of a commissioner who is appointed by the director shall be paid in the same manner as if he were appointed by the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

The rate and manner of payment of compensation for a commissioner who is employed pursuant to Section 2124 shall be fixed by the board of supervisors of the employing county. He is entitled to receive his traveling and incidental expenses which are necessarily incurred in the performance of his duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.

The board of supervisors of any county in which the director is required by Section 2125 to perform the duties of commissioner shall, upon claim which is duly submitted, reimburse the department for all expenses which are incurred by the director in fulfilling his responsibilities in performing such duties. The amount of reimbursement shall not, however, be in excess of an amount which is established by an agreement between the board of supervisors and the director pursuant to Section 482 of this code or Section 25801 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cooperative Salary Agreements [2221. - 2224.]

2221.

For the purpose of this article the base salary of a commissioner is the salary, or if a salary range is established, the lowest step in such range, which was established for the position for the month of January, 1959.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2222.

For the purpose of securing more uniform and adequate enforcement of this code throughout the state, the director may enter into cooperative agreements with the board of supervisors of any county which relate to the compensation of the county agricultural commissioner of the county, or which relate to compensation of the county for services which are performed for the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------

2223.

In the agreement the board of supervisors shall agree not to reduce the salary of the commissioner to less than the base salary. The director may agree to pay to the county a sum not to exceed six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) per year to be used for the salary of the commissioner, or to compensate the county for services which are performed for the department. The amount which is paid to a county shall not, however, exceed two-thirds of the amount of the salary which is paid to its commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------

2224.

The director may agree with the board of supervisors of any county in which no salary was established for the position of commissioner for January, 1959, that the state will pay not to exceed six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) per year of the amount to be used for payment of the salary of a commissioner for such county, or of a commissioner who is employed pursuant to Section 2124. The amount which is paid the county shall not, however, exceed two-thirds of the amount of the salary which is paid to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Offices, Equipment and Supplies [2241. - 2244.]

2241.

As used in this article “commissioner” includes a commissioner who is employed pursuant to Section 2124.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2242.

The board of supervisors shall provide a suitable office for the commissioner, and shall furnish and equip his office with all necessary furniture, supplies, and effects for the proper discharge of his duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2243.

The board of supervisors may also provide the commissioner with all necessary field equipment for the proper discharge of the duties of his office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2244.

All expenses which are ordered by the board of supervisors for the office, furniture, supplies, effects, and equipment for the commissioner are a county charge. The board of supervisors shall allow and pay such expenses out of the general fund of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Powers and Duties [2271. - 2287.]

2271.

The commissioner shall keep a record of his official acts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2272.

(a) The commissioner shall make an annual report to the director on the condition of agriculture in his or her county and on what is being done to eradicate, control, or manage pests, and actions relating to the exclusion of pests or quarantine against pests. The commissioner may include in the annual report information relating to organic farming methods, biotechnology, integrated pest management, and biological control activities in the county. The commissioner shall also furnish from time to time to the director any other information the director may require.

(b) This section shall become operative July 1, 1999.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1998.   Section operative July 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2273.

The commissioner shall also make a monthly report to the board of supervisors if and when so required by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2274.

The commissioner shall learn about all pests that may exist, or are likely to exist, in his county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2275.

The commissioner, for the purpose of learning the best and most efficacious methods of performing his or her duties, shall attend the annual meeting of the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association or its successor, and any other meetings as the secretary or director shall require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2276.

The commissioner shall, for the purpose of becoming informed about new and dangerous agricultural pests, observing and learning new and better methods of pest control, and determining the best and most efficacious methods of conducting the work of his department, consult with staff members of the United States Department of Agriculture, the State Department of Agriculture, the University of California, and with agricultural commissioners of other counties. He shall make such trips outside of the county which are necessary for such purposes, if authorized by the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2276.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, acting under policy direction of the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, California’s unique system of county agricultural commissioners forms the front line of defense in protecting the state from the many exotic and invasive species threatening our people, commerce, and environment.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that agricultural commissioners take an increasingly assertive and proactive role in the exclusion and detection of exotic and invasive species in the urban environment, particularly those potentially spread by human activities, such as landscaping and yard maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2277.

The commissioner shall, if directed by the board of supervisors, collect, prepare, and install exhibits for public information which illustrate the work of his department, depict the resources of the county, or display the products of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2278.

The commissioner may disseminate information which relates to pests that may exist in his county, or are likely to exist in it. The information may include life histories, habits, methods of detection, and methods of control of such pests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2279.

The commissioner shall compile reports of the condition, acreage, production, and value of the agricultural products in his county. The commissioner may publish such reports, and shall transmit a copy of them to the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2280.

The director, when acting in person with a commissioner, has all the rights of such commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

2281.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, in all cases where provisions of this code place joint responsibility for the enforcement of laws and regulations on the director and the commissioner, the commissioner shall be responsible for local administration of the enforcement program. The director shall be responsible for overall statewide enforcement and shall issue instructions and make recommendations to the commissioner. Such instructions and recommendations shall govern the procedure to be followed by the commissioner in the discharge of his duties. The director shall furnish assistance in planning and otherwise developing an adequate county enforcement program, including uniformity, coordination, training, special services, special equipment, and forms, statewide publicity, statewide planning, and emergency assistance.

The instructions and recommendations shall include a cost analysis of the local administration of such programs, determined from data supplied by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2272. Such cost analysis shall identify the joint programs or activities for which funds necessary to maintain adequate county administration and enforcement have not been provided. The director shall develop, jointly with the commissioners, county priorities for such enforcement programs and activities.

The director shall report annually to the Legislature his findings concerning the cost analysis with specific regard to programs where funds are inadequate for an efficient enforcement program, together with a listing of the priorities jointly established by the director and the commissioners that are contained in the formal instructions and recommendations of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 820.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.

(a) Except as provided in Section 2282.5, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act, the Secretary of Food and Agriculture or the Director of Pesticide Regulation may allocate annually to each county an amount determined by the secretary or the director not to exceed one-third of the amount expended by the county during the previous fiscal year for the programs of joint responsibility under the jurisdiction of the secretary or director, as applicable. The allocations shall be made from funds appropriated to the secretary or the director for purposes of carrying out activities of joint responsibility with the commissioners at the local levels.

(b) The annual report to the Legislature required by Section 2281 shall include findings for each of the following joint programs, including the amounts allocated to, and expended by, the counties in the previous fiscal year and the proposed amount to be allocated by the secretary for each program for the ensuing budget year:

(1) Pest detection.

(2) Pest eradication.

(3) Pest management control.

(4) Pest exclusion.

(5) Seed inspection.

(6) Nursery inspection.

(7) Fruit and vegetable quality control.

(8) Egg quality control.

(9) Apiary inspection.

(10) Crop statistics.

The report shall also specify the programs that have been augmented with state funds each year since 1980 because of new legislative mandates, or because of pest infestations or outbreaks occurring since that date, and the annual amounts of those augmentations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   Effective September 23, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2282.5.

(a) The development of work plans for allocation of the funding appropriated in the Budget Act to the department for local assistance for agricultural plant and animal pest and disease prevention shall be the responsibility of the department. The department shall establish criteria for the development of the work plans and for allocating the appropriated funds.

(b) Of the amount appropriated in the Budget Act to the department for local assistance for agricultural plant and animal pest and disease prevention, five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000) shall be utilized solely for high-risk pest exclusion activities. The work plans for the exclusion of high-risk pests shall be developed by the department with the county agricultural commissioners and in consultation with affected industry representatives. In order to determine the effectiveness of high-risk pest exclusion programs in each county, the criteria established by the department for the work plan shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) The number of high-risk plant shipments entering each county.

(2) The number of high-risk entry points in each county.

(3) The number of state action quarantine pests intercepted or detected annually in each county.

(4) The work hours expended by each county in conducting exclusion of high-risk pests.

(5) The rate of interceptions and rejections per inspection activity.

(c) To remain eligible for funding under this section, a county shall maintain its support of ongoing operational costs of the county agricultural commissioner programs listed in subdivision (b) of Section 2282, at 1997–98 fiscal year levels.

(d) Funds allocated for high-risk pest exclusion activities pursuant to subdivision (b) may not be expended for any purpose other than the exclusion or detection of high-risk pests consistent with the work plans prescribed in subdivision (a) or scientific evaluation. Funds allocated by each county on or after September 28, 1998, shall not be allocated to other programs listed in subdivision (b) of Section 2282 until the county work plan is approved by the department consistent with the funding appropriated in the Budget Act to the department for local assistance for agricultural plant and animal pest and disease prevention for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 573, Sec. 3.   Effective September 23, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2283.

The commissioner, in carrying out his responsibilities under Section 2281, may assist the department in the conduct of surveys or investigations pursuant to Section 461 for the purpose of preventing the introduction and spread of injurious insect or animal pests, plant diseases, and noxious weeds under Section 403.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 859, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2284.

The commissioner may, with the approval of the board of supervisors, contract with any person or association to certify the condition of a shipment of a product regulated under this code. The condition certified to may include the temperature of the product. The contract shall provide for payment to the commissioner for the commissioner’s total cost in performing the certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 242, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2285.

For the purpose of developing necessary information and securing the best results for agriculture in this state, the commissioner may correspond and meet with any interested individual, agency, group, association, or educational institution with an interest in, or information regarding, agricultural practices, as resources allow. As used in this section “agriculture” includes, but is not limited to, developments and issues regarding all agricultural practices, traditional and alternative pest control methodology, and other areas of agriculture resource management. The California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association may provide a forum by which a commissioner keeps informed and may facilitate discussions with other associations, institutions, agencies, organizations, or groups relating to resource management and protection for agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2286.

The discretionary immunity doctrine as applied to a public entity and an employee of a public entity pursuant to Sections 815.2 and 820.2 of the Government Code applies to decisions of a county department of agriculture and an employee of a county department of agriculture enforcing a state or local pest control or pest eradication statute, regulation, or ordinance. Nothing in this section authorizes or affects the filing of an action challenging the legal authority of the county department of agriculture to undertake the pest control or eradication action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2287.

Whenever the commissioner determines that it is necessary to more effectively or more efficiently carry out a program listed in subdivision (b) of Section 2282, the commissioner may enter into a mutual aid agreement with other counties for the purpose of sharing staff, equipment, expertise, information, and other resources necessary to meet the needs of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 890, Sec. 6.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. County Veterinarian [2301. - 2344.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appointment [2301. - 2302.]

2301.

A county veterinarian may be appointed by the board of supervisors whenever the public welfare demands the services of such veterinarian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.

The veterinarian shall serve at the pleasure of the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Compensation [2321. - 2321.]

2321.

The veterinarian shall receive a salary which is fixed by the board of supervisors. It shall be payable at the same time, in the same manner, and from the same fund as other county officers are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties [2341. - 2344.]

2341.

The veterinarian shall act under the supervision of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2342.

The veterinarian shall enforce throughout the county all of the provisions of this code which relate to the health and sanitary surroundings of livestock, poultry, and rabbits. He shall enforce within unincorporated territory all orders and ordinances of the board of supervisors which relate to such subjects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2343.

The veterinarian may establish such quarantine, sanitary, and other regulations within his jurisdiction as he deems necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2344.

The veterinarian shall attend such meetings as are deemed necessary and advisable by the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Livestock Pass Program [2350. - 2350.]

2350.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Managerial employee” means a person who meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Has management authority with responsibility to oversee the care and well-being of the qualifying livestock producer’s livestock.

(B) Primarily engages in managerial job duties and customarily and regularly exercises discretion and independent judgment in these duties. These duties shall be specified in a written job description issued no later than 90 days before the date of the flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster.

(C) Earns a monthly salary equivalent to no less than two times the state minimum wage for full-time employment at the time of the flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster.

(2) “Qualifying livestock producer” means a commercial livestock producer, as determined by the county agency, who has been certified as successfully completing the curriculum developed pursuant to Section 13105.6 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(b) (1) Upon the approval of a county board of supervisors, a county agricultural commissioner, or other agency designated by the county board of supervisors, is authorized to establish within that county a livestock pass program for the purpose of issuing identification documents granting any qualifying livestock producer, or a managerial employee of the
 qualifying livestock producer, access to the qualifying livestock producer’s ranch property during or following a flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster.

(2) (A) A managerial employee of a qualifying livestock producer shall not be required by the qualifying livestock producer to obtain a livestock pass. Access to a qualifying livestock producer’s ranch by a managerial employee shall be fully voluntary on the part of the managerial employee.

(B) A person shall not require any employee to obtain or use a livestock pass or to enter or be present on the livestock producer’s ranch property during or following a flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster. A person shall not in any manner discriminate, retaliate, or take any adverse action against an employee for refusing to obtain or use a livestock pass or to enter or be
 present on the livestock producer’s ranch property during or following a flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster. Any person who believes that they have been discriminated or retaliated against in violation of this section may, in addition to any other available remedy, file a complaint pursuant to Section 98.7 of the Labor Code for remedies available under Section 98.6 of the Labor Code.

(C) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a managerial employee of a qualifying livestock producer to be present on a ranch property during or following a flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster. 

(c) (1) An applicant for a livestock pass shall provide, or the relevant county agency shall otherwise obtain, documentation sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant is a commercial livestock producer, or a
 managerial employee of a commercial livestock producer. The documentation may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) An operator identification number issued by a county agricultural commissioner.

(B) An Internal Revenue Service Schedule F (Form 1040) attesting to the applicant’s Profit or Loss From Farming.

(C) Assessor’s parcel numbers confirming agricultural zoning for the property or properties upon which access is sought.

(D) Agricultural land lease documentation.

(E) Documentation attesting to the applicant’s enrollment in a Williamson Act contract as authorized pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the
 Government Code.

(F) Documentation from the United States Department of Agriculture Farm Service Agency attesting that the applicant is a commercial livestock producer.

(G) Current registration of a livestock brand with the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(2) An applicant for a livestock pass shall furnish to the relevant county agency a description or map of all lands owned or managed by the applicant for which disaster access is sought.

(d) (1) Access granted pursuant to a livestock pass shall be limited to the purposes of sheltering, moving, transporting, evacuating, feeding, watering, or administering veterinary care to livestock, or providing local expertise to peace officers and emergency personnel. Local expertise shall
 only be provided upon the request of peace officers and emergency personnel.

(2) A holder of a livestock pass may have access to the ranch property that is owned by another holder of a livestock pass, with permission from that livestock passholder, for purposes of providing assistance with those activities specified in paragraph (1) during or following a flood, storm, fire, earthquake, or other disaster.

(3) Access under this section to areas closed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 409.5 of the Penal Code may only be granted by the incident commander, a law enforcement official having jurisdiction, or their designee. When access is granted by emergency response personnel other than the incident commander, the emergency response personnel shall notify incident command that access has been provided to the livestock passholder. 

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “local expertise” may include identifying access roads, water points, and other local knowledge that may assist firefighters or other emergency response personnel.

(e) (1) A livestock pass identification document issued pursuant to subdivision (b) for the purpose of authorizing access during a disaster shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(A) The name of the applicant and cardholder.

(B) The name or names of the ranch to which the cardholder seeks access in the event of a disaster.

(C) The expiration date of the identification document, if an expiration date was established by the county.

(D) The seal or logo of the authorizing agency and the signature of the issuing officer.

(2) A livestock pass identification document authorizing access during a disaster that does not include a photograph of the cardholder shall not be a valid document for purposes of subdivision (b) unless accompanied by a valid photo identification document issued by the state or federal government.

(f) Notwithstanding this section, a livestock pass issued by a county in which a livestock pass or equivalent program was established before January 1, 2022, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section until the expiration date noted on the livestock pass or until December 31, 2025, whichever date occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   (AB 1103)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. EXPOSITIONS AND FAIRS [3001. - 4703.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [3001. - 3224.]



  CHAPTER 1. Free Admissions [3001. - 3029.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [3001. - 3003.]

3001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of the chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

“Courtesy pass admission” means any admission, without payment of the admission charge, to any state, county, district, or citrus fruit fair, except any of the following:

(a) Credential admission.

(b) Admission of any child under 12 years of age.

(c) Admission of any military personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

“Credential admission” means any admission which is authorized by the board of directors of a state, district, or citrus fruit fair, or by the board of supervisors of a county for admission to a fair without payment of the admission charge when a service is rendered by the person who is admitted which is necessary for the conduct of the fair.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [3021. - 3029.]

3021.

Every state, district, county, or citrus fruit fair which receives any money from the State Treasury shall permit the admission without payment of the admission charge of all children 12 years of age or under on at least one day, which is designated by the fair, during each fair period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3022.

If a charge is made for admission to enter a state, district, county, or citrus fruit fair, the following persons may be admitted to those fairgrounds without the payment of the established admission price:

(a) Persons with credential admissions.

(b) Persons with courtesy pass admissions.

(c) Military
 personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 206, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3023.

A credential admission may be issued to any individual, association, or body that does any of the following:

(a) Prepares or services any educational, commercial, industrial, livestock, agricultural, horticultural, or viticultural display or exhibit.

(b) Services, maintains, or operates any concession.

(c) Renders, through agreement with the fair, a service to fair patrons.

(d) Renders a necessary public service.

(e) Safeguards health.

(f) Provides for public safety.

(g) Participates in any parade or event which is necessary for the conduct of the fair.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3024.

Credential admissions may, also, be issued to any of the following persons:

(a) Representatives of press, radio, and television personally engaged in obtaining and transmitting public information.

(b) Ambulance drivers.

(c) Firemen on duty.

(d) Repairmen who are necessary to service utilities.

(e) Employees of the fair.

(f) State officials in the performance of their duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.

The words “credential admission” shall be printed on each ticket which is issued as a credential admission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3026.

The percentage of courtesy pass admissions to any state, county, district, or citrus fruit fair shall not exceed 4 percent of the gross paid admission to the fair in the preceding calendar year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3027.

A courtesy pass admission is not transferable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3028.

Each fair shall maintain complete records of the number of credential and courtesy pass admissions which are issued for each fair period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3029.

Each fair shall make an annual report to the department, as prescribed by the department, of the total number of credential and courtesy pass admissions issued and honored at the fair.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fairs and District Agricultural Associations [3101. - 3106.]

3101.

(a) “Fair,” or “state-designated fairground,” referred to in this division, means the California Exposition and State Fair in the City of Sacramento and those fairs specified in Sections 3102, 3103, and 3104 that may receive financial support or are otherwise governed pursuant to this chapter. These fairs may also be referred to as part of the “network of California fairs.”

(b) A nonprofit organization that holds an annual fair pursuant to Section 4163 may elect to be a member of the network of California fairs on terms and conditions mutually agreed upon by the department and the nonprofit organization.

(c) A joint powers agency that holds an annual fair pursuant to Section 4171
 may elect to be a member of the network of California fairs on terms and conditions mutually agreed upon by the department and the joint powers agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 35.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

The district agricultural associations and their locations are as follows:

(a) District 1 is the County of Alameda.

(b) District 1-A is the County of San Mateo and the City and County of San Francisco, held in the City of Daly City.

(c) District 2 is the County of San Joaquin, held in the City of Stockton.

(d) District 3 is the County of Butte, held in the City of Chico.

(e) District 4 is the Counties of Sonoma and Marin, held in the City of Petaluma.

(f) District 5 is the City and County of San Francisco, held in the City and County of San Francisco.

(g) District 6 is all of that portion of the County of Los Angeles that is not included in District 48, District 50, and District 51, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, also includes that portion of the County of Los Angeles within the boundaries of the 29th Senatorial District. District 6 shall also be known and designated as Exposition Park and shall have all of the following powers and duties:

(1) To lease, exchange, sell, or otherwise dispose of all property.

(2) To compromise and settle claims of every nature.

(3) To sue and be sued in the same manner and to the same extent as the California Science Center, and
 the members of the governing body thereof.

(h) District 7 is the County of Monterey, held in the City of Monterey.

(i) District 9 is the County of Humboldt, held in the City of Eureka.

(j) District 10 is that portion of the County of Siskiyou that is not included in District 10-A, held in the City of Yreka.

(k) (1) District 10-A is all of that portion of the Counties of Siskiyou and Modoc that is described as follows:

(2) Beginning at the intersection of west longitude 122 degrees 10 minutes within the Oregon-California boundary line, thence southerly along said line of longitude to north latitude 41 degrees 30 minutes, thence easterly along said line of latitude to
 the point where it intersects west longitude 121 degrees 10 minutes, thence northerly along said line of longitude to the Oregon state line, thence westerly along said state line to the point of beginning, held in the City of Tulelake.

(l) District 12 is the County of Mendocino, held in the City of Ukiah.

(m) District 13 is the Counties of Sutter and Yuba, held in the City of Yuba City.

(n) District 14 is the County of Santa Cruz, held in the City of Watsonville.

(o) District 15 is all of that portion of the County of Kern that is not included in District 53, held in the City of Bakersfield.

(p) District 16 is the County of San Luis Obispo, held in the City of Paso Robles.

(q) District 17 is the County of Nevada, held in the City of Grass Valley.

(r) District 18 is the Counties of Mono, Inyo, and Alpine, held in the City of Bishop.

(s) District 19 is all of that portion of the County of Santa Barbara that lies east of Gaviota and south of the Santa Ynez Mountains, held in the City of Santa Barbara.

(t) District 20 is the County of Placer, held in the City of Auburn.

(u) District 21 is the County of Fresno, held in the City of Fresno.

(v) District 21-A is the County of Madera, held in the City of Madera.

(w) District 22 is the County
 of San Diego, held in the City of Del Mar.

(x) District 23 is the County of Contra Costa, held in the City of Antioch.

(y) District 24 is the County of Tulare, held in the City of Tulare.

(z) District 24-A is the County of Kings, held in the City of Hanford.

(aa) District 25 is the County of Napa, held in the City of Napa.

(ab) District 26 is the County of Amador, held in the City of Plymouth.

(ac) District 27 is the County of Shasta, held in the City of Anderson.

(ad) District 28 is the County of San Bernardino, held in the City of Victorville.

(ae) District 29 is the County of Tuolumne, held in the City of Sonora.

(af) District 30 is the County of Tehama, held in the City of Red Bluff.

(ag) District 31 is the County of Ventura, held in the City of Ventura.

(ah) District 32 is the County of Orange, held in the City of Costa Mesa.

(ai) District 33 is the County of San Benito, held in the City of Hollister.

(aj) District 34 is that portion of the County of Modoc that is not included in District 10-A, held in the Town of Cedarville.

(ak) District 35 is the County of Merced, held in the City of Merced.

(al) District 35-A is the County of Mariposa, held in the Town of Mariposa.

(am) District 36 is the County of Solano, held in the City of Dixon.

(an) District 37 is all of that portion of the County of Santa Barbara that is not included in District 19, held in the City of Santa Maria.

(ao) District 38 is the County of Stanislaus, held in the City of Turlock.

(ap) District 39 is the County of Calaveras, held in the City of Angels Camp.

(aq) District 40 is the County of Yolo, held in the City of Woodland.

(ar) District 41 is the County of Del Norte, held in
 the City of Crescent City.

(as) District 42 is the County of Glenn, held in the City of Orland.

(at) District 44 is the County of Colusa, held in the City of Colusa.

(au) District 45 is the County of Imperial, held in the City of Imperial.

(av) District 46 is all of that portion of the County of Riverside that is not included in District 54, held in the City of Perris.

(aw) District 48 is the County of Los Angeles, held in the City of City of Industry.

(ax) District 49 is the County of Lake, held in the City of Lakeport.

(ay) District 50 is all of that portion
 of the County of Los Angeles that lies north of the south line of Township 5 North, San Bernardino base, held in the City of Lancaster.

(az) (1) District 51 is all of the portion of the City of Los Angeles that is described as follows:

(2) From a point commencing where the most northerly boundary of the City of Los Angeles intersects with the Golden State Freeway and following on the city boundary in an easterly direction where the boundary first intersects with the boundary of the City of Burbank; thence continuing southeasterly along the City of Burbank boundary to its intersection with Barham Boulevard; thence in a southerly direction on Barham Boulevard to its intersection with Cahuenga Boulevard; thence in a southeasterly direction on Cahuenga Boulevard to Mulholland Drive; thence along Mulholland Drive to the City of Los Angeles boundary; thence